Arkansas, session 2025, HB1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-411(a)(1)—(3), concerning the
eligibility of certain retired employees under the State and Public School
Life and Health Insurance Program, are amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) State employee retirees and public school retirees are
qualified to enroll in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance
Program as retirees if they:
(A) Have participated in the program State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program for at least five (5) cumulative
years before retirement as participating and are also vested members of:
(i) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System, including the members of the legislative division and the contract
personnel of the Arkansas National Guard;
(ii) The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;
(iii) The Arkansas State Highway Employees'
*ANS174*
02-25-2025 09:29:49 ANS174

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1327
Retirement System;
(iv) The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System; or
(v) An alternate retirement plan as defined in § 24-
7-202; and
(B) Are retired and drawing benefits under as determined
by one (1) or more of the retirement systems listed under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section.
(2)(A)(i) If a state employee retiree or a public school
employee retiree who is a member of a retirement system listed under
subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section receives retirement benefits, thereby
becoming an active retiree, and has participated in the program State and
Public School Life and Health Insurance Program for at least five (5)
cumulative years before retirement, the active retiree may elect to enroll in
the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program.
(ii) The election to enroll in the program State and
Public School Life and Health Insurance Program shall be made within thirty
(30) days of the state employee retiree's or public school employee retiree's
becoming an active retiree and shall be made in writing to the Employee
Benefits Division on forms required by the division.
(B)(i) To Except when prohibited by federal law, to be
eligible to continue coverage or to qualify for coverage after electing to
decline participation in the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program, the retiree must have been covered for at least five (5)
cumulative years before the retiree's employment ended.
(ii) If Except when prohibited by federal law, if a
retiree declines to participate in the program State and Public School Life
and Health Insurance Program at the time of retirement because the retiree is
already covered under another employer-sponsored group health insurance
policy, the retiree may make a one-time election to participate in the
program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program if the
retiree experiences a qualifying event with proof of continued insurance
coverage at the time of open enrollment and documentation that the retiree
was covered under the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program for at least five (5) cumulative years before retirement.
(C)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(C)(ii) of
this section, an active retiree's failure to make an election to participate
02-25-2025 09:29:49 ANS174

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1327
in the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program
during the thirty-day election period or an active retiree's election to
decline participation in the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program is final.
(ii) If an active retiree declines participation in
the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program because
the active retiree has health insurance coverage through another employer
group health plan program and the active retiree's coverage was subsequently
terminated because of a loss of eligibility, as defined by Internal Revenue
Service regulations, and provides information from the former insurance
company of the loss of eligibility, then the active retiree shall qualify for
participation in the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program upon confirmation that the active retiree participated in
the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program for at
least five (5) cumulative years before retirement and payment of the
appropriate premium as determined by the State Board of Finance under
subdivision (a)(5) of this section if the active retiree applies for
participation in the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program within thirty (30) days of the loss of eligibility.
(3)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in
this section, a state employee or public school employee who has five (5)
cumulative years of participation in the program State and Public School Life
and Health Insurance Program before retirement and ten (10) or more years of
creditable service under the terms of a retirement plan program listed in
this section shall qualify for continued participation in the program State
and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program if the state employee or
public school employee is separated from employment because of the expiration
of a fixed period of employment.
(B)(i) A state employee or public school employee
qualifying for continued participation in the program State and Public School
Life and Health Insurance Program under this subsection shall be considered
an inactive retiree and shall have thirty-one (31) days from the effective
date of termination to elect to continue participation in the program State
and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program under this section by
notifying the division.
(ii) The election to continue participation in the
02-25-2025 09:29:49 ANS174

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1327
program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program shall be
made in writing on forms required by the division.
(C)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii) of
this section, an inactive retiree's failure to elect to continue
participation in the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program during the thirty-day election period or an inactive
retiree's election to decline participation in the program State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program is final.
(ii) If an inactive retiree as described in
subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section declines participation in the program
State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program because the
inactive retiree has health insurance coverage through another employer-
sponsored group health plan program and the inactive retiree's coverage is
subsequently terminated because of a loss of eligibility, then the inactive
retiree and any dependents shall qualify for participation in the program
State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program if, within thirty
(30) days of the inactive retiree's involuntary loss of coverage, the
inactive retiree submits to the board:
(a) Payment of the appropriate premium as
determined by the board under subdivision (a)(5) of this section;
(b) Proof that, until the inactive retiree's
involuntary loss of coverage through another employer-sponsored group health
plan program, the coverage had been continuous; and
(c) Proof that the inactive retiree
participated in the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance
Program for at least five (5) cumulative years before retirement.
(D) An eligible inactive retiree shall be reclassified as
an active retiree upon electing to receive a retirement benefit by a
retirement system listed under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section and
shall be charged the premium rate appropriate for his or her rating category
as an active retiree as determined by the board under subdivision (a)(5) of
this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-5-411(d)(2)(B), concerning the
eligibility of dependents of certain retired employees under the State and
Public School Life and Health Insurance Program, is amended to read as
02-25-2025 09:29:49 ANS174

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1327
follows:
(B) Subsequent to the active or inactive retiree's
declination of health insurance coverage for the dependent under subdivision
(d)(2)(A) of this section, the dependent involuntarily lost his or her
employer-sponsored group health insurance coverage, and the loss of health
insurance coverage was not the result of:
(i) Fraud; or
(ii) Voluntary cessation of premium payment while
the active or inactive retiree was covered by a plan program option offered
under the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program;
and

/s/Warren























02-25-2025 09:29:49 ANS174